src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/uk.aff
SFX B Y 1267
SFX B 0       
SFX B 0       
SFX B            
SFX B         [^ ]   
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B         [^ ]   
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B         [^ ]   
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B         [^ ]   
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B         [^ ]   
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B         [^ ]   
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B        [        ]   
SFX B          [        ]     
SFX B        [        ]   
SFX B          [        ]     
SFX B          [    ]     
SFX B            [    ]       
SFX B          [    ]     
SFX B            [    ]       
SFX B           [    ]     
SFX B             [    ]       
SFX B            [    ]     
SFX B              [    ]       
SFX B            [    ]     
SFX B              [    ]       
SFX B            [    ]     
SFX B              [    ]       
SFX B            [    ]     
SFX B              [    ]       
SFX B            [    ]     
SFX B              [    ]       
SFX B            [    ]     
SFX B              [    ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B        [  ]     
SFX B          [  ]       
SFX B        [  ]     
SFX B          [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B         [  ]     
SFX B           [  ]       
SFX B         [  ]     
SFX B           [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B         [  ]     
SFX B           [  ]       
SFX B         [  ]     
SFX B           [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B           [   ]     
SFX B             [   ]       
SFX B           [   ]     
SFX B             [   ]       
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B         [    ]    
SFX B           [    ]      
SFX B         [    ]    
SFX B           [    ]      
SFX B         [^  ]     
SFX B           [^  ]       
SFX B         [^  ]     
SFX B           [^  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B             [^ ]       
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B             [^ ]       
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B             [^ ]       
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B             [^ ]       
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B               
SFX B                   
SFX B               
SFX B                   
SFX B               
SFX B                   
SFX B               
SFX B                   
SFX B            [   ]     
SFX B              [   ]       
SFX B            [   ]     
SFX B              [   ]       
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [^  ]     
SFX B            [^  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B            [^ ]     
SFX B              [^ ]       
SFX B            [^ ]     
SFX B              [^ ]       
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [^  ]     
SFX B             [^  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                     
SFX B                         
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B              [   ]     
SFX B                [   ]       
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                     
SFX B                         
SFX B                     
SFX B                         
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B              [   ]     
SFX B                [   ]       
SFX B              [   ]     
SFX B                [   ]       
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                     
SFX B                         
SFX B                     
SFX B                         
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B              [   ]     
SFX B                [   ]       
SFX B              [   ]     
SFX B                [   ]       
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B           [  ]    
SFX B             [  ]      
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B           [^  ]     
SFX B             [^  ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B             [^ ]     
SFX B               [^ ]       
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                     
SFX B                         
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B              [   ]     
SFX B                [   ]       
SFX B         [    ]    
SFX B           [    ]      
SFX B         [    ]    
SFX B           [    ]      
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B         [^  ]     
SFX B           [^  ]       
SFX B         [^  ]     
SFX B           [^  ]       
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B             [^ ]       
SFX B           [^ ]     
SFX B             [^ ]       
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                 
